Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.301

Becoming limited partner.

A person becomes a limited partner:

(1) As provided in the partnership agreement;

(2) As the result of a conversion or merger under article 11 of this chapter; or

(3) With the consent of all the partners.

[ 2009 c 188 s 301.]